Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska27-601
Rule 601. General rule of competency.

Every person is competent to be a witness except as otherwise provided in these rules.

Laws 1975, LB 279, § 34.

The question of the competency of a child witness rests largely within the discretion of the trial court, and that determination will not be disturbed in the absence of an abuse of discretion. State v. Guy, 227 Neb. 610, 419 N.W.2d 152 (1988).

No abuse of discretion to allow 5-year-old's testimony when conflicting testimony was caused by nature of defense counsel's questions, which created question of credibility and not competency. State v. Miner, 216 Neb. 309, 343 N.W.2d 899 (1984).

Except as specifically provided otherwise by the rules of evidence, every person is competent to be a witness about those things of which he has personal knowledge. Tuch v. Tuch, 210 Neb. 601, 316 N.W.2d 304 (1982).

Where injured victim of defendant's assault with a gun was defendant's wife, she was competent to testify where the jury had prior knowledge of her condition. State v. Martin, 198 Neb. 811, 255 N.W.2d 844 (1977).